Wyoming, session 2026, HB0024.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-3-307(b) and 21-3-308(a) are
amended to read:
21-3-307. Charter application; contents; phased-in
application process.
(b) Upon submission of an application under W.S.
21-3-307(a), the authorizer shall notify the applicant
within thirty (30) days of submission whether the
application is complete. If the authorizer determines that
the application is incomplete, the authorizer shall advise
the applicant of the reasons for the determination in
sufficient detail for the applicant to make changes for
resubmission of the application to the authorizer.
21-3-308. Hearing by authorizer; prohibited actions
by authorizer; criteria; compliance with state standards;
contractual authority.
(a) Not later than sixty (60) days After receiving an
application for any charter school which has been
determined to be complete pursuant to W.S. 21-3-307(b), the
authorizer shall hold a public hearing on the application,
at which time the authorizer shall consider the level of
community and parental support for the application if an
application for a new charter school, or the level of
teacher and parental support if an application for a
converted charter school or charter school within a school.
The application review process shall also include an
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0024
ENROLLED ACT NO. 15, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
in-person interview of the applicant or applicant group.
Following review of the application and the public hearing,
if applicable, and in accordance with subsection (d) of
this section, the authorizer shall either approve or deny
the application within ninety (90) one hundred twenty (120)
days of receipt. In addition, the authorizer may approve an
application for the operation of a converted charter school
only if it determines teacher and parental support for the
conversion are established at the levels required by W.S.
21-3-306(b). Prior to approving an application for a
charter school under this section, the authorizer shall
approve and adopt the content and terms of the charter as
provided in W.S. 21-3-307.
Section 2. This act shall apply to new charter school
applications submitted on or after the effective date of
this act.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0024
ENROLLED ACT NO. 15, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3